Illinois, session 104th, SB2323.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. This Act may be referred to as the Illinois 5Statewide Trauma-Informed Response to Human Trafficking Act.  6    Section 2. Findings.7    (a) Human trafficking cuts across gender, race, age, 8immigration status, nationality, ability, income, and 9educational levels.10    (b) A multitude of factors can create susceptibility to 11the force, fraud, and coercion used by traffickers to exploit 12unmet physical, emotional, financial, or other needs of 13targeted persons. Vulnerability factors include, but are not 14limited to, poverty, prior sexual or domestic abuse, housing 15insecurity, immigration status, sexual orientation, gender 16identity, physical, mental and intellectual disability and 17limited education.18    (c) The complex trauma experienced by human trafficking 19survivors requires services from persons who have received 20training in effective responses to victims of human 21trafficking.22    (d) Trafficking for labor and sex exists in Illinois but 23it is going unrecognized because victims are not being   SB2323 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1identified and the underlying crimes are not being reported. 2The National Human Trafficking Hotline in 2021 reported 929 3unique calls and texts and identified 355 victims from 4Illinois, including 177 sex and 27 labor trafficking cases. 5Fifty of those identified victims were minors. InfoNet, 6operated by the Illinois Criminal Justice Information 7Authority (ICJIA), indicates that 569 new client cases of sex 8and labor trafficking were identified and served via domestic 9violence and sexual assault service providers throughout 10Illinois in calendar years 2021, 2022, and 2023. There was a 11trend of increased victim identification during those years 12from 235 in 2021, 266 in 2022, to 303 in 2023. While the 13programs reporting to InfoNet primarily serve adults, 27 14minors and 96 youth survivors between the ages of 18 and 24 15were identified and served by these programs. The crime of 16human trafficking was identified only 73 times between 2021 17and 2023 according to the Illinois National Incident-Based 18Reporting System (NIBRS).19    (e) Child and youth victims of human trafficking are 20especially vulnerable as they are often trafficked by someone 21with whom they share a household or familial relationship, 22and, due to their developmental stage, have a need for a safe 23caregiving adult. Many have also previously experienced 24physical or sexual abuse. Between 2021 and 2023, 966 possible 25cases of child trafficking were identified by the Illinois 26Department of Children and Family Services via reports of   SB2323 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1abuse or neglect. Of these, 292 (30.2%) were "indicated", 2meaning investigation found that these were cases of 3trafficking. There was a downward trend in the numbers of 4allegations and identification of child victims from 105 of 5416 (25.2%) indicated in 2021, to 104 of 312 (33.3%) in 2022, 6to 83 of 238 (34.8%) in 2023.7    (f) Survivors of sex and labor trafficking often do not 8identify themselves as victims of human trafficking which, 9unless they are identified as victims by others, hinders their 10access to specialized services and considerations in the 11criminal justice system.12    (g) Victims have difficulty leaving their trafficking 13situation due to the use of force, fraud, and coercive tactics 14by traffickers, many of whom exploit existing systemic 15barriers or other experiences faced by victims. These barriers 16or experiences could include prior criminal history, mistrust 17or previous experience with government systems, fear for 18themselves or family members, debt and poverty, isolation, 19language barriers, undocumented immigration status, or lack of 20knowledge of the United States legal system and their rights 21under it.22    (h) Labor trafficking victims are especially difficult to 23identify and engage. The National Human Trafficking Hotline in 242021 identified 177 incidents of sex trafficking, 27 incidents 25of labor trafficking and 15 incidents involving both labor and 26sex trafficking in Illinois. Illinois sexual assault and   SB2323 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1domestic violence agencies reported serving 266 survivors of 2either sex or labor trafficking or both in 2022.3    (i) Illinois' government response system is fragmented 4without clear processes and procedures and without dedicated 5funding for specialized services for human trafficking 6survivors. Currently, federal funding is the primary source of 7funding for dedicated human trafficking service providers in 8Illinois.9    (j) No State standards for victim-centered, 10trauma-informed responses exist for the professions that are 11in a position to identify, treat, or otherwise respond to 12victims of human trafficking in Illinois.13    (k) Current Illinois multi-disciplinary response systems 14which are comprised of dedicated service providers, law 15enforcement and prosecutors are fragmented with 2 16multi-disciplinary task forces funded by the U.S. Department 17of Justice's Office of Victims of Crime located in Northern 18Illinois and Lake County, Illinois and other unfunded regional 19and local task forces operating independently.20    (l) The Illinois General Assembly finds that to identify 21and respond to labor and sex trafficking in Illinois and 22restore the dignity and future of survivors that a statewide 23strategic framework to prevent, detect and respond to victims 24of human trafficking must be established.25    (m) The General Assembly further finds that there is a 26need to create standards for training of human trafficking   SB2323 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1service providers, law enforcement, prosecutors, public 2defenders, and housing, mental health, substance use disorder, 3medical personnel and other professions in order to ensure 4that victims of human trafficking in Illinois are identified 5and receive a victim-centered, trauma-informed response when 6they are identified or present for service. 7    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 8by adding Section 45.1 as follows: 9    (20 ILCS 505/45.1 new)10    Sec. 45.1. Department of Children and Family Services 11human trafficking unit.12    (a) The Department of Children and Family Services shall: 13        (1) maintain a human trafficking unit to coordinate 14    services, initiate prevention efforts, and provide access 15    to resources for case-management staff to serve youth in 16    care who have been determined to be victims of human 17    trafficking or assessed to be at high risk of becoming a 18    victim of human trafficking, as well as ensure a timely 19    response by the Department to recover youth in care in the 20    custody of law enforcement or in the care of a Department 21    of Humans Services Comprehensive Community Based Youth 22    Services (CCBYS) service provider; 23        (2) ensure that all youth in care are screened during 24    the initial integrated assessment to identify those who   SB2323 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    may be at high risk of trafficking, based on experiences 2    of commercial sexual exploitation and other indicators of 3    human trafficking, and ensure that those identified are 4    screened for and, as relevant, provided with specialized 5    services; 6        (3) collaborate with the Department of Human Services 7    and other State agencies to develop screening and 8    follow-up protocols to respond to children and adolescents 9    who may be victims of human trafficking or at risk of human 10    trafficking regardless of immigration or legal status; 11        (4) require victim-centered, trauma-informed human 12    trafficking training for Department employees and 13    contractors providing specialized services to children and 14    youth who are victims of human trafficking or at risk of 15    human trafficking including caseworkers, investigators, 16    foster parents, and residential home personnel; 17        (5) require that all alleged child victims of human 18    trafficking be referred to the local child advocacy center 19    to coordinate and facilitate a multi-disciplinary 20    response;21        (6) increase trauma-informed placement options for 22    youth in care, who have been determined to be victims of 23    human trafficking or assessed to be at high risk of 24    becoming a victim of human trafficking; and 25        (7) on or before July 1, 2026, incorporate services 26    for all child human trafficking victims into the   SB2323 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    community-based services provided by the Department. 2    (b) Definitions. In this Section:3    "Child or children" has the same meaning as a minor and 4refers to persons under the age of 18. 5    "Human trafficking" means a violation or attempted 6violation of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012. "Human 7trafficking" includes trafficking of children and adults for 8both labor and sex services. 9    "Specialized services" means services for youth in care 10determined to be victims of human trafficking, those assessed 11as high risk for trafficking, or those with a history of sexual 12exploitation, and may include the following: treatment for 13substance use, mental health needs, medical treatment, case 14management, or housing.  15    Section 10. The Department of Human Services Act is 16amended by adding Section 1-90 as follows: 17    (20 ILCS 1305/1-90 new)18    Sec. 1-90. Statewide plan; victims of human trafficking. 19    (a) In this Section, "human trafficking" means a violation 20or attempted violation of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 212012. Human trafficking includes trafficking of children and 22adults for both labor and sex services. 23    (b) The Department of Human Services shall:24        (1) on or before December 31, 2025, develop and submit   SB2323 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    a strategic plan to the Governor and General Assembly to 2    establish a statewide system of identification and 3    response to survivors of human trafficking and recommended 4    levels of funding for phase-in of comprehensive 5    victim-centered, trauma-informed statewide services for 6    victims of human trafficking, including adults, youth and 7    children, and to sex and labor trafficking victims 8    regardless of immigration or legal status. The plan shall 9    be developed in consultation with survivors, human 10    trafficking service providers, and State agencies 11    including the Department of Human Services, Department of 12    Children and Family Services, Illinois State Police, and 13    Department of Labor. The Department of Human Services 14    shall also solicit input from a broad range of partners 15    with relevant expertise in the areas of: housing and 16    shelter; youth crisis response; adult and pediatric 17    healthcare; substance use disorders, behavioral and mental 18    health; legal and immigration services; disability; 19    domestic violence and sexual assault advocacy; law 20    enforcement; justice system including the Office of the 21    State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor, prosecutors and 22    public defenders, county detention centers, probation 23    court services, and the Administrative Office of the 24    Illinois Courts; State agencies, including the Department 25    of Juvenile Justice, Department of Public Health, 26    Department of Corrections, and Illinois Criminal Justice   SB2323 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    Information Authority; and federally funded and regional 2    multi-disciplinary human trafficking task forces.3        (2) on or before July 1, 2026, develop service 4    standards for organizations providing victim services to 5    survivors of human trafficking based upon victim-centered, 6    trauma-informed best practices in consultation with 7    survivors and experts in the field and consistent with 8    standards developed by the United States Department of 9    Justice, Office of Victims of Crime;10        (3) on or before October 1, 2026, develop standardized 11    training curriculum for individuals who provide advocacy, 12    counseling, mental health, substance use disorder, 13    homelessness, immigration, legal, and case-management 14    services for survivors of human trafficking with input 15    from survivors and experts in the field;16        (4) provide consultation to State professional 17    associations in the development of trainings for 18    healthcare professionals, including those in training, and 19    attorneys who are likely to provide services to survivors 20    of human trafficking; and21        (5) provide consultation to State agencies, including, 22    but not limited to, the Department of Children and Family 23    Services, the Department of Juvenile Justice, and the 24    Department of Corrections, to assist with development of 25    training and screening tools.   SB2323 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    Section 15. The Department of Labor Law of the Civil 2Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 31505-225 as follows: 4    (20 ILCS 1505/1505-225 new)5    Sec. 1505-225. Training courses on human trafficking. 6    (a) In this Section:7    "Child" refers to a person under the 18 years of age. 8    "Human trafficking" means a violation or attempted 9violation of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012. "Human 10trafficking" includes trafficking of children and adults for 11both labor and sex services. 12    (b) Working with other State agencies and in collaboration 13with the Department of Human Services, the Department of Labor 14shall develop training for State health inspectors, Department 15of Labor investigators, licensing inspectors, and other 16relevant government regulators on indications of human 17trafficking, including child trafficking, in industries at 18high risk for labor trafficking, including, but not limited 19to, restaurants, hotels, construction, and agriculture and how 20to respond if trafficking is suspected. The Department of 21Labor shall develop education materials on workers' rights and 22recourse for labor exploitation posted on the Department's 23website and on the rights of child and youth workers and 24indicators of child labor trafficking for regional offices of 25education.   SB2323 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    Section 20. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 2Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 32605-625 as follows: 4    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-625 new)5    Sec. 2605-625. Illinois State Police to develop a 6strategic plan and support and coordinate with 7multi-disciplinary human trafficking task forces (MDHTTF) to 8improve victim-centered, trauma-informed law enforcement 9response to victims of human trafficking across the State. 10    (a) In this Section: 11    "Children" means persons under 18 years of age. 12    "Human trafficking" means a violation or attempted 13violation of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012. "Human 14trafficking" includes trafficking of children and adults for 15both labor and sex services. 16    "Multi-disciplinary human trafficking task forces" 17(MDHTTF) means task forces established to coordinate 18detection, investigation, and response to victims of human and 19child trafficking across multiple jurisdictions and 20disciplines and whose participants may include, but are not 21limited to, federal, State, and local law enforcement, local 22government, the Illinois State Police, the Departments of 23Children and Family Services, Juvenile Justice, and 24Corrections, prosecutors, children's advocacy centers, adult   SB2323 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1and pediatric medical personnel, and service providers 2specializing in victim-centered, trauma-informed response to 3victims of human trafficking. Such multi-disciplinary task 4forces may include Metropolitan Enforcement Groups as defined 5in Section 3 of the Intergovernmental Drug Laws Enforcement 6Act. 7    (b) The Illinois State Police shall:8        (1) on or before July 1, 2026, develop a strategic 9    plan to improve victim-centered, trauma-informed law 10    enforcement response to victims of human trafficking 11    across the State, in consultation with the Department of 12    Human Services, victim-centered, trauma-informed human 13    trafficking service providers, local, State, and federal 14    law enforcement partners, metropolitan enforcement groups 15    (MEG) and task forces, existing federally funded task 16    forces, and allied organizations;17        (2) support implementation of a network of 18    multi-disciplinary human trafficking task forces (MDHTTF) 19    across the State building upon the existing 20    multi-disciplinary human trafficking task forces, and in 21    partnership with the Department of Human Services, 22    victim-centered, trauma-informed human trafficking 23    service providers, children's advocacy centers, local, 24    State, and federal law enforcement partners, MEGs and 25    multi-jurisdictional law enforcement task forces, existing 26    federally funded task forces, and allied organizations.   SB2323 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    Each MDHTTF shall include at least one representative from 2    each of the following: a local, regional or statewide 3    organization which has received specialized training in 4    victim-centered, trauma-informed response to victims of 5    human trafficking, a local or county law enforcement 6    agency, a prosecutor and a children's advocacy center;7        (3) convene representatives from Illinois 8    multi-disciplinary human trafficking task forces on a 9    quarterly basis to discuss emerging issues, law 10    enforcement strategies, and changes to protocols needed to 11    hold perpetrators of human trafficking accountable;12        (4) convene an annual statewide conference for 13    stakeholders and multi-disciplinary human trafficking task 14    forces (MDHTTF) to provide training and discuss strategies 15    to reduce and respond to human trafficking in the State in 16    partnership with the Department of Human Services with the 17    input of victim-centered, trauma-informed human 18    trafficking service providers, and subject to 19    appropriation;20        (5) create standardized protocols for law enforcement 21    investigations and multi-disciplinary response to 22    referrals from the National Human Trafficking Hotline, 23    other tip-line calls, traffic interdiction of suspected 24    traffickers, and other human trafficking victim referrals 25    in partnership with the Department of Human Services, 26    victim-centered, trauma-informed human trafficking   SB2323 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    service providers, local, State, and federal law 2    enforcement partners, MEG and task forces, existing 3    federally funded task forces, and allied organizations;4        (6) work with the Illinois Law Enforcement Training 5    Standards Board, local law enforcement, victim-centered, 6    trauma-informed service providers, and survivor leaders to 7    develop, on or before July 1, 2026, curriculum standards 8    for law enforcement training on human trafficking;9        (7) on or before July 1, 2026, work with the Illinois 10    Law Enforcement Training Standards Board, in consultation 11    with the Attorney General, law enforcement agencies, human 12    trafficking service providers, and other providers with 13    expertise in recognizing and responding to victims of 14    human trafficking, to develop and make available to each 15    law enforcement agency, comprehensive guidelines for 16    creation of a law enforcement agency policy on 17    victim-centered, trauma-informed detection, 18    investigation, and response to victims of human 19    trafficking; and20        (8) provide support for local law enforcement 21    encountering victims of human trafficking. 22    Section 25. The Illinois Police Training Act is amended by 23changing Sections 2, 10.21 and 10.23 and by adding Section 2410.27 as follows:   SB2323 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    (50 ILCS 705/2)  (from Ch. 85, par. 502)2    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 3context otherwise requires:4    "Board" means the Illinois Law Enforcement Training 5Standards Board.6    "Full-time law enforcement officer" means a law 7enforcement officer who has completed the officer's 8probationary period and is employed on a full-time basis as a 9law enforcement officer by a local government agency, State 10government agency, or as a campus police officer by a 11university, college, or community college. 12    "Law Enforcement agency" means any entity with statutory 13police powers and the ability to employ individuals authorized 14to make arrests. It does not include the Illinois State Police 15as defined in the State Police Act. A law enforcement agency 16may include any university, college, or community college. 17    "Local law enforcement agency" means any law enforcement 18unit of government or municipal corporation in this State. It 19does not include the State of Illinois or any office, officer, 20department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency of 21the State, except that it does include a State-controlled 22university, college or public community college.23    "State law enforcement agency" means any law enforcement 24agency of this State. This includes any office, officer, 25department, division, bureau, board, commission, or agency of 26the State. It does not include the Illinois State Police as   SB2323 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1defined in the State Police Act.2    "Panel" means the Certification Review Panel. 3    "Basic training school" means any school located within 4the State of Illinois whether privately or publicly owned 5which offers a course in basic law enforcement or county 6corrections training and has been approved by the Board.7    "Probationary police officer" means a recruit law 8enforcement officer required to successfully complete initial 9minimum basic training requirements at a basic training school 10to be eligible for permanent full-time employment as a local 11law enforcement officer.12    "Probationary part-time police officer" means a recruit 13part-time law enforcement officer required to successfully 14complete initial minimum part-time training requirements to be 15eligible for employment on a part-time basis as a local law 16enforcement officer.17    "Permanent law enforcement officer" means a law 18enforcement officer who has completed the officer's 19probationary period and is permanently employed on a full-time 20basis as a local law enforcement officer, as a security 21officer, or campus police officer permanently employed by a 22law enforcement agency.23    "Part-time law enforcement officer" means a law 24enforcement officer who has completed the officer's 25probationary period and is employed on a part-time basis as a 26law enforcement officer or as a campus police officer by a law   SB2323 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1enforcement agency.2    "Law enforcement officer" means (i) any police officer of 3a law enforcement agency who is primarily responsible for 4prevention or detection of crime and the enforcement of the 5criminal code, traffic, or highway laws of this State or any 6political subdivision of this State or (ii) any member of a 7police force appointed and maintained as provided in Section 2 8of the Railroad Police Act.9    "Recruit" means any full-time or part-time law enforcement 10officer or full-time county corrections officer who is 11enrolled in an approved training course.12    "Review Committee" means the committee at the Board for 13certification disciplinary cases in which the Panel, a law 14enforcement officer, or a law enforcement agency may file for 15reconsideration of a decertification decision made by the 16Board. 17    "Probationary county corrections officer" means a recruit 18county corrections officer required to successfully complete 19initial minimum basic training requirements at a basic 20training school to be eligible for permanent employment on a 21full-time basis as a county corrections officer.22    "Permanent county corrections officer" means a county 23corrections officer who has completed the officer's 24probationary period and is permanently employed on a full-time 25basis as a county corrections officer by a participating law 26enforcement agency.  SB2323 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    "County corrections officer" means any sworn officer of 2the sheriff who is primarily responsible for the control and 3custody of offenders, detainees or inmates.4    "Probationary court security officer" means a recruit 5court security officer required to successfully complete 6initial minimum basic training requirements at a designated 7training school to be eligible for employment as a court 8security officer.9    "Permanent court security officer" means a court security 10officer who has completed the officer's probationary period 11and is employed as a court security officer by a participating 12law enforcement agency.13    "Court security officer" has the meaning ascribed to it in 14Section 3-6012.1 of the Counties Code.15    "Trauma" means physical or emotional harm resulting from 16an event, series of events, or set of circumstances that has 17led to lasting adverse effects on an individual's mental, 18physical, social, emotional, and spiritual well-being.19    "Trauma-informed response" means a program, organization, 20or system that is trauma-informed; realizes the widespread 21impact of trauma and understands potential paths for recovery; 22recognizes the signs and symptoms of trauma in clients, 23families, staff, and others involved with the system; and 24responds by fully integrating knowledge about trauma into 25policies, procedures, and practices, and seeks to actively 26avoid re-traumatization and to restore autonomy and stability   SB2323 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1to survivors. 2(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 1-1-22; 102-694, eff. 1-7-22.) 3    (50 ILCS 705/10.21)4    Sec. 10.21. Training; sexual assault and sexual abuse.5    (a) The Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board 6shall conduct or approve training programs in trauma-informed 7responses and investigations of sexual assault and sexual 8abuse, which include, but is not limited to, the following:9        (1) recognizing the symptoms of trauma;10        (2) understanding the role trauma has played in a 11    victim's life;12        (3) responding to the needs and concerns of a victim;13        (4) delivering services in a compassionate, sensitive, 14    and nonjudgmental manner;15        (5) interviewing techniques in accordance with the 16    curriculum standards in subsection (f) of this Section;17        (6) understanding cultural perceptions and common 18    myths of sexual assault and sexual abuse;19        (7) report writing techniques in accordance with the 20    curriculum standards in subsection (f) of this Section; 21    and 22        (8) recognizing special sensitivities of victims due 23    to: age, including those under the age of 13; race; color; 24    creed; religion; ethnicity; gender; sexual orientation; 25    physical or mental disabilities; immigration status;   SB2323 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    national origin; justice-involvement; past human 2    trafficking victimization or involvement in the sex trade; 3    or other qualifications; and .4        (9) screening of victims of sexual assault and sexual 5    abuse for human trafficking. 6    (b) This training must be presented in all full and 7part-time basic law enforcement academies on or before July 1, 82018.9    (c) Agencies employing law enforcement officers must 10present this training to all law enforcement officers within 3 11years after January 1, 2017 (the effective date of Public Act 1299-801) and must present in-service training on sexual assault 13and sexual abuse response and report writing training 14requirements every 3 years.15    (d) Agencies employing law enforcement officers who 16conduct sexual assault and sexual abuse investigations must 17provide specialized training to these officers on sexual 18assault and sexual abuse investigations within 2 years after 19January 1, 2017 (the effective date of Public Act 99-801) and 20must present in-service training on sexual assault and sexual 21abuse investigations to these officers every 3 years. In 22consultation with a statewide nonprofit, nongovernmental 23organization that represents survivors of sexual violence, the 24training shall include instruction on screening of victims of 25sexual assault and sexual abuse for human trafficking 26victimization.   SB2323 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    (e) Instructors providing this training shall (1) have 2successfully completed (A) training on evidence-based, 3trauma-informed, victim-centered response to cases of sexual 4assault and sexual abuse and (B) using curriculum for the 5training created in consultation with a statewide nonprofit, 6nongovernmental organization that represents survivors of 7sexual violence, training on screening of victims of sexual 8assault and sexual abuse for human trafficking victimization 9and (2) have experience responding to sexual assault and 10sexual abuse cases.11    (f) The Board shall adopt rules, in consultation with the 12Office of the Illinois Attorney General and the Illinois State 13Police, to determine the specific training requirements for 14these courses, including, but not limited to, the following:15        (1) evidence-based curriculum standards for report 16    writing and immediate response to sexual assault and 17    sexual abuse, including trauma-informed, victim-centered, 18    age sensitive, interview techniques, which have been 19    demonstrated to minimize retraumatization, for 20    probationary police officers and all law enforcement 21    officers; and22        (2) evidence-based curriculum standards for 23    trauma-informed, victim-centered, age sensitive 24    investigation and interviewing techniques, which have been 25    demonstrated to minimize retraumatization, for cases of 26    sexual assault and sexual abuse for law enforcement   SB2323 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    officers who conduct sexual assault and sexual abuse 2    investigations.3(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 4    (50 ILCS 705/10.23)5    Sec. 10.23. Training and curriculum; human trafficking. 6    (a) The Board shall work with the Illinois State Police, 7local law enforcement, victim-centered, trauma-informed human 8trafficking service providers, and survivor leaders to 9develop, on or before July 1, 2026, academy and in-service 10curriculum standards for training on victim-centered, 11trauma-informed detection, investigation, and response to 12human trafficking victims certified by the Board. 13    (b) The Board shall conduct or approve an in-service 14training program in the detection, and investigation, and 15victim-centered, trauma-informed response to victims of all 16forms of human trafficking, including, but not limited to, 17involuntary servitude under subsection (b) of Section 10-9 of 18the Criminal Code of 2012, involuntary sexual servitude of a 19minor under subsection (c) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal 20Code of 2012, and trafficking in persons under subsection (d) 21of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012. This program 22shall be made available to all certified law enforcement, 23correctional, and court security officers.24(Source: P.A. 101-18, eff. 1-1-20; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)   SB2323 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    (50 ILCS 705/10.27 new)2    Sec. 10.27. Trauma-informed response to victims of human 3trafficking policies.4    (a) On or before July 1, 2027, every law enforcement 5agency shall develop, adopt, and implement written policies 6detailing procedures for victim-centered, trauma-informed 7detection, investigation and response to victims of human 8trafficking consistent with the guidelines developed under 9subsection (b).10    (b) On or before July 1, 2026, the Board, in consultation 11with the Illinois State Police, local law enforcement 12agencies, human trafficking service providers, and other 13providers with expertise in recognizing and responding to 14victims of human trafficking shall develop and make available 15to each law enforcement agency comprehensive guidelines for 16creation of a law enforcement agency policy on 17trauma-informed, victim-centered detection, investigation, 18and response to victims of human trafficking. These guidelines 19shall include, but not be limited to, the following:20        (1) definitions;21        (2) recognizing human trafficking;22        (3) description of trauma-informed, victim-centered 23    response;24        (4) responding officer duties;25        (5) human trafficking investigations;26        (6) protocols for responding to child and youth   SB2323 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    victims of human trafficking;2        (7) addressing immediate and emergent needs of 3    victims;4        (8) working with survivor advocates and human 5    trafficking service providers;6        (9) victim interviews;7        (10) evidence collection;8        (11) supervisor duties;9        (12) suspect interviews;10        (13) witness interviews;11        (14) working with State's Attorneys and prosecutors;12        (15) working with multi-disciplinary teams and federal 13    agencies;14        (16) language barriers and interpreters;15        (17) victims' rights;16        (18) considerations for specific populations or 17    communities, and18        (19) special needs and tools for victims who are 19    foreign nationals. 20    Section 30. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 21adding Section 25-210 as follows: 22    (30 ILCS 500/25-210 new)23    Sec. 25-210. Contracts for the procurement or laundering 24of apparel. Each contractor who contracts with a State agency   SB2323 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1for the procurement or laundering of apparel shall certify 2that no work was provided through the use of forced labor or 3exploitation. 4    Section 35. The Children's Advocacy Center Act is amended 5by changing Section 4 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 80/4)  (from Ch. 23, par. 1804)7    Sec. 4. Children's Advocacy Center. 8    (a) A CAC may be established to coordinate the activities 9of the various agencies involved in the investigation, 10prosecution and treatment of child maltreatment. The 11individual county or regional Advisory Board shall set the 12written protocol of the CAC within the appropriate 13jurisdiction. The operation of the CAC may be funded through 14public or private grants, contracts, donations, fees, and 15other available sources under this Act. Each CAC shall operate 16to the best of its ability in accordance with available 17funding. In counties in which a referendum has been adopted 18under Section 5 of this Act, the Advisory Board, by the 19majority vote of its members, shall submit a proposed annual 20budget for the operation of the CAC to the county board, which 21shall appropriate funds and levy a tax sufficient to operate 22the CAC. The county board in each county in which a referendum 23has been adopted shall establish a Children's Advocacy Center 24Fund and shall deposit the net proceeds of the tax authorized   SB2323 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1by Section 6 of this Act in that Fund, which shall be kept 2separate from all other county funds and shall only be used for 3the purposes of this Act.4    (b) The Advisory Board shall pay from the Children's 5Advocacy Center Fund or from other available funds the 6salaries of all employees of the Center and the expenses of 7acquiring a physical plant for the Center by construction or 8lease and maintaining the Center, including the expenses of 9administering the coordination of the investigation, 10prosecution and treatment referral of child maltreatment under 11the provisions of the protocol adopted pursuant to this Act.12    (b-1) Recognizing the pivotal role of CACs in providing 13comprehensive support to trafficked children and youth, each 14CAC shall:15        (1) ensure that each county's multi-disciplinary team 16    protocol includes a response to allegations of human 17    trafficking;18        (2) increase the capacity of each multi-disciplinary 19    team to identify, assess, and serve trafficked children 20    and youth;21        (3) facilitate collaboration between the CAC, law 22    enforcement, child welfare agencies, health care 23    providers, and other pertinent stakeholders to ensure a 24    synchronized and trauma-informed response to trafficked 25    children and youth; 26        (4) ensure all CAC employees and contractors treating,   SB2323 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    interviewing, or coming in contact with victims receive 2    training on victim-centered, trauma-informed response to 3    child and youth victims of human trafficking, including 4    identifying and addressing the unique needs of trafficked 5    children and youth, thereby enabling access to appropriate 6    support services and legal remedies; and 7        (5) work with the Department of Human Services to 8    establish standards for victim-centered, trauma-informed 9    training for CACs and members of multi-disciplinary teams. 10    (c) Every CAC shall include at least the following 11components:12        (1) A multidisciplinary, coordinated systems approach 13    to the investigation of child maltreatment which shall 14    include, at a minimum:15            (i) an interagency notification procedure;16            (ii) a policy on multidisciplinary team 17        collaboration and communication that requires MDT 18        members share information pertinent to investigations 19        and the safety of children;20            (iii) (blank);21            (iv) a description of the role each agency has in 22        responding to a referral for services in an individual 23        case;24            (v) a dispute resolution process between the 25        involved agencies when a conflict arises on how to 26        proceed on the referral of a particular case;  SB2323 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1            (vi) a process for the CAC to assist in the 2        forensic interview of children that witness alleged 3        crimes;4            (vii) a child-friendly, trauma informed space for 5        children and their non-offending family members;6            (viii) an MDT approach including law enforcement, 7        prosecution, medical, mental health, victim advocacy, 8        and other community resources;9            (ix) medical evaluation on-site or off-site 10        through referral;11            (x) mental health services on-site or off-site 12        through referral;13            (xi) on-site forensic interviews;14            (xii) culturally competent services;15            (xiii) case tracking and review;16            (xiv) case staffing on each investigation;17            (xv) effective organizational capacity; and 18            (xvi) a policy or procedure to familiarize a child 19        and his or her non-offending family members or 20        guardians with the court process as well as 21        preparations for testifying in court, if necessary; 22        (2) A safe, separate space with assigned personnel 23    designated for the investigation and coordination of child 24    maltreatment cases;25        (3) A multidisciplinary case review process for 26    purposes of decision-making, problem solving, systems   SB2323 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    coordination, and information sharing;2        (4) A comprehensive client tracking system to receive 3    and coordinate information concerning child maltreatment 4    cases from each participating agency;5        (5) Multidisciplinary specialized training for all 6    professionals involved with the victims and non-offending 7    family members in child maltreatment cases; and8        (6) A process for evaluating the effectiveness of the 9    CAC and its operations.10    (d) In the event that a CAC has been established as 11provided in this Section, the Advisory Board of that CAC may, 12by a majority vote of the members, authorize the CAC to 13coordinate the activities of the various agencies involved in 14the investigation, prosecution, and treatment referral in 15cases of serious or fatal injury to a child. For CACs receiving 16funds under Section 5 or 6 of this Act, the Advisory Board 17shall provide for the financial support of these activities in 18a manner similar to that set out in subsections (a) and (b) of 19this Section and shall be allowed to submit a budget that 20includes support for physical abuse and neglect activities to 21the County Board, which shall appropriate funds that may be 22available under Section 5 of this Act. In cooperation with the 23Department of Children and Family Services Child Death Review 24Teams, the Department of Children and Family Services Office 25of the Inspector General, and other stakeholders, this 26protocol must be initially implemented in selected counties to   SB2323 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1the extent that State appropriations or funds from other 2sources for this purpose allow. 3    (e) CACI may also provide technical assistance and 4guidance to the Advisory Boards.5    (f) In this Section:6    "Child" or "children" refers to persons under 18 years of 7age. 8    "Youth" means persons between the ages of 18 and 24 years. 9(Source: P.A. 98-809, eff. 1-1-15; 99-78, eff. 7-20-15.) 10    Section 40. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 11adding Section 5-175 as follows: 12    (705 ILCS 405/5-175 new)13    Sec. 5-175. Minor accused of status offense or 14misdemeanor. It is an affirmative defense to any status or 15misdemeanor offense that would not be illegal if committed by 16an adult that a minor who is a victim of an offense defined in 17Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012 committed the status 18or misdemeanor offense during the course of or as a result of 19the minor's status as a victim of an offense defined in Section 2010-9 of that Code. 21    Section 45. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 22changing Section 10-9 as follows:   SB2323 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    (720 ILCS 5/10-9)2    Sec. 10-9. Trafficking in persons, involuntary servitude, 3and related offenses.4    (a) Definitions. In this Section:5    (1) "Intimidation" has the meaning prescribed in Section 612-6.7    (2) "Commercial sexual activity" means any sex act on 8account of which anything of value is given, promised to, or 9received by any person. 10    (2.5) "Company" means any sole proprietorship, 11organization, association, corporation, partnership, joint 12venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, 13limited liability limited partnership, limited liability 14company, or other entity or business association, including 15all wholly owned subsidiaries, majority-owned subsidiaries, 16parent companies, or affiliates of those entities or business 17associations, that exist for the purpose of making profit. 18    (3) "Financial harm" includes intimidation that brings 19about financial loss, criminal usury, or employment contracts 20that violate the Frauds Act.21    (4) (Blank).22    (5) "Labor" means work of economic or financial value.23    (6) "Maintain" means, in relation to labor or services, to 24secure continued performance thereof, regardless of any 25initial agreement on the part of the victim to perform that 26type of service.  SB2323 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    (7) "Obtain" means, in relation to labor or services, to 2secure performance thereof.3    (7.5) "Serious harm" means any harm, whether physical or 4nonphysical, including psychological, financial, or 5reputational harm, that is sufficiently serious, under all the 6surrounding circumstances, to compel a reasonable person of 7the same background and in the same circumstances to perform 8or to continue performing labor or services in order to avoid 9incurring that harm. 10    (8) "Services" means activities resulting from a 11relationship between a person and the actor in which the 12person performs activities under the supervision of or for the 13benefit of the actor. Commercial sexual activity and 14sexually-explicit performances are forms of activities that 15are "services" under this Section. Nothing in this definition 16may be construed to legitimize or legalize prostitution.17    (9) "Sexually-explicit performance" means a live, 18recorded, broadcast (including over the Internet), or public 19act or show intended to arouse or satisfy the sexual desires or 20appeal to the prurient interests of patrons.21    (10) "Trafficking victim" means a person subjected to the 22practices set forth in subsection (b), (c), or (d).23    (b) Involuntary servitude. A person commits involuntary 24servitude when he or she knowingly subjects, attempts to 25subject, or engages in a conspiracy to subject another person 26to labor or services obtained or maintained through any of the   SB2323 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1following means, or any combination of these means: 2        (1) causes or threatens to cause physical harm to any 3    person;4        (2) physically restrains or threatens to physically 5    restrain another person;6        (3) abuses or threatens to abuse the law or legal 7    process;8        (4) attempts to or knowingly destroys, conceals, 9    removes, confiscates, or possesses any actual or purported 10    passport or other immigration document, or any other 11    actual or purported government identification document, of 12    another person;13        (5) uses intimidation, abuses a position of trust, 14    authority, or supervision in relation to the victim, 15    through the use or deprivation of any alcoholic 16    intoxicant, a drug as defined or used in the Illinois 17    Controlled Substances Act or the Cannabis Control Act, or 18    methamphetamine as defined in the Methamphetamine Control 19    and Community Protection Act, or exerts financial control 20    over any person; or21        (6) uses any scheme, plan, or pattern intended to 22    cause the person to believe that, if the person did not 23    perform the labor or services, that person or another 24    person would suffer serious harm or physical restraint. 25    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 26or (f), a violation of subsection (b)(1) is a Class X felony,   SB2323 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1(b)(2) is a Class 1 felony, (b)(3) is a Class 2 felony, (b)(4) 2is a Class 3 felony, (b)(5) and (b)(6) is a Class 4 felony. 3    (c) Involuntary sexual servitude of a minor. A person 4commits involuntary sexual servitude of a minor when he or she 5knowingly recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides, or 6obtains by any means, or attempts to recruit, entice, harbor, 7provide, or obtain by any means, another person under 18 years 8of age, knowing that the minor will engage in commercial 9sexual activity, a sexually-explicit performance, or the 10production of pornography, or causes or attempts to cause a 11minor to engage in one or more of those activities and:12        (1) there is no overt force or threat and the minor is 13    between the ages of 17 and 18 years;14        (2) there is no overt force or threat and the minor is 15    under the age of 17 years; or16        (3) there is overt force or threat.17    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 18or (f), a violation of subsection (c)(1) is a Class 1 felony, 19(c)(2) is a Class X felony, and (c)(3) is a Class X felony. 20    (d) Trafficking in persons. A person commits trafficking 21in persons when he or she knowingly: (1) recruits, entices, 22harbors, transports, provides, or obtains by any means, or 23attempts to recruit, entice, harbor, transport, provide, or 24obtain by any means, another person, intending or knowing that 25the person will be subjected to involuntary servitude; or (2) 26benefits, financially or by receiving anything of value, from   SB2323 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1participation in a venture that has engaged in an act of 2involuntary servitude or involuntary sexual servitude of a 3minor. A company commits trafficking in persons when the 4company knowingly benefits, financially or by receiving 5anything of value, from participation in a venture that has 6engaged in an act of involuntary servitude or involuntary 7sexual servitude of a minor.8    Sentence. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) 9or (f), a violation of this subsection by a person is a Class 1 10felony. A violation of this subsection by a company is a 11business offense for which a fine of up to $100,000 may be 12imposed.13    (e) Aggravating factors. A violation of this Section 14involving kidnapping or an attempt to kidnap, aggravated 15criminal sexual assault or an attempt to commit aggravated 16criminal sexual assault, or an attempt to commit first degree 17murder is a Class X felony. 18    (f) Sentencing considerations.19        (1) Bodily injury. If, pursuant to a violation of this 20    Section, a victim suffered bodily injury, the defendant 21    may be sentenced to an extended-term sentence under 22    Section 5-8-2 of the Unified Code of Corrections. The 23    sentencing court must take into account the time in which 24    the victim was held in servitude, with increased penalties 25    for cases in which the victim was held for between 180 days 26    and one year, and increased penalties for cases in which   SB2323 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    the victim was held for more than one year.2        (2) Number of victims. In determining sentences within 3    statutory maximums, the sentencing court should take into 4    account the number of victims, and may provide for 5    substantially increased sentences in cases involving more 6    than 10 victims.7        (3) Age of victim. In determining sentences, the 8    sentencing court shall take into account the age of the 9    victim or victims. 10    (g) Restitution. Restitution is mandatory under this 11Section. In addition to any other amount of loss identified, 12the court shall order restitution including the greater of (1) 13the gross income or value to the defendant of the victim's 14labor or services or (2) the value of the victim's labor as 15guaranteed under the Minimum Wage Law and overtime provisions 16of the Fair Labor Standards Act (FLSA) or the Minimum Wage Law, 17whichever is greater.18    (g-5) Fine distribution. If the court imposes a fine under 19subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this Section, it shall be 20collected and distributed to the Specialized Services for 21Survivors of Human Trafficking Fund in accordance with Section 225-9-1.21 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 23    (h) Trafficking victim services. Subject to the 24availability of funds, the Department of Human Services may 25provide or fund emergency services and assistance to 26individuals who are victims of one or more offenses defined in   SB2323 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1this Section. 2    (i) Certification. The Attorney General, a State's 3Attorney, or any law enforcement official shall certify in 4writing to the United States Department of Justice or other 5federal agency, such as the United States Department of 6Homeland Security, that an investigation or prosecution under 7this Section has begun and the individual who is a likely 8victim of a crime described in this Section is willing to 9cooperate or is cooperating with the investigation to enable 10the individual, if eligible under federal law, to qualify for 11an appropriate special immigrant visa and to access available 12federal benefits. Cooperation with law enforcement shall not 13be required of victims of a crime described in this Section who 14are under 18 years of age. This certification shall be made 15available to the victim and his or her designated legal 16representative. 17    (j) A person who commits involuntary servitude, 18involuntary sexual servitude of a minor, or trafficking in 19persons under subsection (b), (c), or (d) of this Section is 20subject to the property forfeiture provisions set forth in 21Article 124B of the Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963. 22(Source: P.A. 101-18, eff. 1-1-20.) 23    Section 50. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 24amended by changing Sections 106B-5 and 115-10 as follows:   SB2323 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    (725 ILCS 5/106B-5)2    Sec. 106B-5. Testimony by a victim who is a child or a 3person with a moderate, severe, or profound intellectual 4disability or a person affected by a developmental disability.5    (a) In a proceeding in the prosecution of an offense of 6criminal sexual assault, predatory criminal sexual assault of 7a child, aggravated criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual 8abuse, aggravated criminal sexual abuse, aggravated battery, 9or aggravated domestic battery, trafficking in persons, 10involuntary servitude, or involuntary sexual servitude of a 11minor, a court may order that the testimony of a victim who is 12a child under the age of 18 years or a person with a moderate, 13severe, or profound intellectual disability or a person 14affected by a developmental disability be taken outside the 15courtroom and shown in the courtroom by means of a closed 16circuit television if:17        (1) the testimony is taken during the proceeding; and18        (2) the judge determines that testimony by the child 19    victim or victim with a moderate, severe, or profound 20    intellectual disability or victim affected by a 21    developmental disability in the courtroom will result in 22    the child or person with a moderate, severe, or profound 23    intellectual disability or person affected by a 24    developmental disability suffering serious emotional 25    distress such that the child or person with a moderate, 26    severe, or profound intellectual disability or person   SB2323 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    affected by a developmental disability cannot reasonably 2    communicate or that the child or person with a moderate, 3    severe, or profound intellectual disability or person 4    affected by a developmental disability will suffer severe 5    emotional distress that is likely to cause the child or 6    person with a moderate, severe, or profound intellectual 7    disability or person affected by a developmental 8    disability to suffer severe adverse effects.9    (b) Only the prosecuting attorney, the attorney for the 10defendant, and the judge may question the child or person with 11a moderate, severe, or profound intellectual disability or 12person affected by a developmental disability.13    (c) The operators of the closed circuit television shall 14make every effort to be unobtrusive.15    (d) Only the following persons may be in the room with the 16child or person with a moderate, severe, or profound 17intellectual disability or person affected by a developmental 18disability when the child or person with a moderate, severe, 19or profound intellectual disability or person affected by a 20developmental disability testifies by closed circuit 21television:22        (1) the prosecuting attorney;23        (2) the attorney for the defendant;24        (3) the judge;25        (4) the operators of the closed circuit television 26    equipment; and  SB2323 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1        (5) any person or persons whose presence, in the 2    opinion of the court, contributes to the well-being of the 3    child or person with a moderate, severe, or profound 4    intellectual disability or person affected by a 5    developmental disability, including a person who has dealt 6    with the child in a therapeutic setting concerning the 7    abuse, a parent or guardian of the child or person with a 8    moderate, severe, or profound intellectual disability or 9    person affected by a developmental disability, and court 10    security personnel.11    (e) During the child's or person with a moderate, severe, 12or profound intellectual disability or person affected by a 13developmental disability's testimony by closed circuit 14television, the defendant shall be in the courtroom and shall 15not communicate with the jury if the cause is being heard 16before a jury.17    (f) The defendant shall be allowed to communicate with the 18persons in the room where the child or person with a moderate, 19severe, or profound intellectual disability or person affected 20by a developmental disability is testifying by any appropriate 21electronic method.22    (f-5) There is a rebuttable presumption that the testimony 23of a victim who is a child under 13 years of age shall testify 24outside the courtroom and the child's testimony shall be shown 25in the courtroom by means of a closed circuit television. This 26presumption may be overcome if the defendant can prove by   SB2323 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1clear and convincing evidence that the child victim will not 2suffer severe emotional distress. 3    (f-6) Before the court permits the testimony of a victim 4outside the courtroom that is to be shown in the courtroom by 5means of a closed circuit television, the court must make a 6finding that the testimony by means of closed circuit 7television does not prejudice the defendant. 8    (g) The provisions of this Section do not apply if the 9defendant represents himself pro se.10    (h) This Section may not be interpreted to preclude, for 11purposes of identification of a defendant, the presence of 12both the victim and the defendant in the courtroom at the same 13time.14    (i) This Section applies to prosecutions pending on or 15commenced on or after the effective date of this amendatory 16Act of 1994.17    (j) For the purposes of this Section, "developmental 18disability" includes, but is not limited to, cerebral palsy, 19epilepsy, and autism. 20(Source: P.A. 103-164, eff. 1-1-24.) 21    (725 ILCS 5/115-10)  (from Ch. 38, par. 115-10)22    Sec. 115-10. Certain hearsay exceptions. 23    (a) In a prosecution for a physical or sexual act 24perpetrated upon or against a child under the age of 13, a 25person with an intellectual disability, a person with a   SB2323 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1cognitive impairment, or a person with a developmental 2disability, including, but not limited to, prosecutions for 3violations of Sections 11-1.20 through 11-1.60 or 12-13 4through 12-16 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code 5of 2012 and prosecutions for violations of Sections 10-1 6(kidnapping), 10-2 (aggravated kidnapping), 10-3 (unlawful 7restraint), 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful restraint), 10-4 8(forcible detention), 10-5 (child abduction), 10-6 (harboring 9a runaway), 10-7 (aiding or abetting child abduction), 10-9 10(trafficking in persons, involuntary servitude, and related 11offenses), 11-9 (public indecency), 11-11 (sexual relations 12within families), 11-21 (harmful material), 12-1 (assault), 1312-2 (aggravated assault), 12-3 (battery), 12-3.2 (domestic 14battery), 12-3.3 (aggravated domestic battery), 12-3.05 or 1512-4 (aggravated battery), 12-4.1 (heinous battery), 12-4.2 16(aggravated battery with a firearm), 12-4.3 (aggravated 17battery of a child), 12-4.7 (drug induced infliction of great 18bodily harm), 12-5 (reckless conduct), 12-6 (intimidation), 1912-6.1 or 12-6.5 (compelling organization membership of 20persons), 12-7.1 (hate crime), 12-7.3 (stalking), 12-7.4 21(aggravated stalking), 12-10 or 12C-35 (tattooing the body of 22a minor), 12-11 or 19-6 (home invasion), 12-21.5 or 12C-10 23(child abandonment), 12-21.6 or 12C-5 (endangering the life or 24health of a child) or 12-32 (ritual mutilation) of the 25Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or any sex 26offense as defined in subsection (B) of Section 2 of the Sex   SB2323 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1Offender Registration Act, the following evidence shall be 2admitted as an exception to the hearsay rule:3        (1) testimony by the victim of an out of court 4    statement made by the victim that he or she complained of 5    such act to another; and6        (2) testimony of an out of court statement made by the 7    victim describing any complaint of such act or matter or 8    detail pertaining to any act which is an element of an 9    offense which is the subject of a prosecution for a sexual 10    or physical act against that victim. 11    (b) Such testimony shall only be admitted if:12        (1) The court finds in a hearing conducted outside the 13    presence of the jury that the time, content, and 14    circumstances of the statement provide sufficient 15    safeguards of reliability; and16        (2) The child or person with an intellectual 17    disability, a cognitive impairment, or developmental 18    disability either:19            (A) testifies at the proceeding; or20            (B) is unavailable as a witness and there is 21        corroborative evidence of the act which is the subject 22        of the statement; and23        (3) In a case involving an offense perpetrated against 24    a child under the age of 13, the out of court statement was 25    made before the victim attained 13 years of age or within 3 26    months after the commission of the offense, whichever   SB2323 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    occurs later, but the statement may be admitted regardless 2    of the age of the victim at the time of the proceeding.3    (c) If a statement is admitted pursuant to this Section, 4the court shall instruct the jury that it is for the jury to 5determine the weight and credibility to be given the statement 6and that, in making the determination, it shall consider the 7age and maturity of the child, or the intellectual 8capabilities of the person with an intellectual disability, a 9cognitive impairment, or developmental disability, the nature 10of the statement, the circumstances under which the statement 11was made, and any other relevant factor.12    (d) The proponent of the statement shall give the adverse 13party reasonable notice of his intention to offer the 14statement and the particulars of the statement.15    (e) Statements described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of 16subsection (a) shall not be excluded on the basis that they 17were obtained as a result of interviews conducted pursuant to 18a protocol adopted by a Child Advocacy Advisory Board as set 19forth in subsections (c), (d), and (e) of Section 3 of the 20Children's Advocacy Center Act or that an interviewer or 21witness to the interview was or is an employee, agent, or 22investigator of a State's Attorney's office.23    (f) For the purposes of this Section:24    "Person with a cognitive impairment" means a person with a 25significant impairment of cognition or memory that represents 26a marked deterioration from a previous level of function.   SB2323 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1Cognitive impairment includes, but is not limited to, 2dementia, amnesia, delirium, or a traumatic brain injury.3    "Person with a developmental disability" means a person 4with a disability that is attributable to (1) an intellectual 5disability, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, or autism, or (2) any 6other condition that results in an impairment similar to that 7caused by an intellectual disability and requires services 8similar to those required by a person with an intellectual 9disability.10    "Person with an intellectual disability" means a person 11with significantly subaverage general intellectual functioning 12which exists concurrently with an impairment in adaptive 13behavior.14(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15; 99-752, eff. 1-1-17; 15100-201, eff. 8-18-17.) 16    Section 55. The Sexual Assault Incident Procedure Act is 17amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 18    (725 ILCS 203/10)19    Sec. 10. Definitions. In this Act:20    "Board" means the Illinois Law Enforcement Training 21Standards Board.22    "Evidence-based, trauma-informed, victim-centered" means 23policies, procedures, programs, and practices that have been 24demonstrated to minimize retraumatization associated with the   SB2323 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1criminal justice process by recognizing the presence of trauma 2symptoms and acknowledging the role that trauma has played in 3a sexual assault or sexual abuse victim's life and focusing on 4the needs and concerns of a victim that ensures compassionate 5and sensitive delivery of services in a nonjudgmental manner.6    "Human trafficking" means a violation or attempted 7violation of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012. "Human 8trafficking" includes trafficking of children and adults for 9both labor and sex services. 10    "Law enforcement agency having jurisdiction" means the law 11enforcement agency in the jurisdiction where an alleged sexual 12assault or sexual abuse occurred.13    "Sexual assault evidence" means evidence collected in 14connection with a sexual assault or sexual abuse 15investigation, including, but not limited to, evidence 16collected using the Illinois State Police Sexual Assault 17Evidence Collection Kit as defined in Section 1a of the Sexual 18Assault Survivors Emergency Treatment Act.19    "Sexual assault or sexual abuse" means an act of 20nonconsensual sexual conduct or sexual penetration, as defined 21in Section 12-12 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or Section 11-0.1 22of the Criminal Code of 2012, including, without limitation, 23acts prohibited under Sections 12-13 through 12-16 of the 24Criminal Code of 1961 or Sections 11-1.20 through 11-1.60 of 25the Criminal Code of 2012.26(Source: P.A. 99-801, eff. 1-1-17.)   SB2323 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    Section 60. The State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor's 2Act is amended by adding Section 4.13 as follows: 3    (725 ILCS 210/4.13 new)4    Sec. 4.13. Prosecutorial support for State's Attorneys 5prosecuting human traffickers. 6    (a) The Office shall provide prosecutorial support for 7State's Attorneys prosecuting human traffickers. Working with 8national and State subject matter experts, the Office shall 9develop and provide training for State's Attorneys in 10victim-centered, trauma-informed prosecution of human 11trafficking cases.12    (b) Training for prosecutors shall include, but not be 13limited to the following:14        (1) definitions;15        (2) sex trafficking and labor trafficking;16        (3) state human trafficking laws;17        (4) federal human trafficking laws;18        (5) elements of a trauma-informed, victim-centered 19    response and understanding the impacts of trauma on victim 20    response;21        (6) identifying human trafficking victims;22        (7) victim recruitment;23        (8) human trafficking myths and misconceptions;24        (9) human trafficking investigations and gang   SB2323 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    involvement in human trafficking;2        (10) protocols for responding to minor and youth 3    victims of human trafficking;4        (11) working with human trafficking victims and the 5    prosecutor-victim relationship;6        (12) role of survivor advocates and human trafficking 7    treatment providers;8        (13) risk assessment and safety planning;9        (14) victim interviews;10        (15) evidence collection and virtual case 11    investigation;12        (16) charging, arraignment, and evidentiary hearings, 13    assessing culpability, and forced criminality;14        (17) trial issues and strategies;15        (18) dealing with witness intimidation;16        (19) working with multi-disciplinary teams and federal 17    agencies;18        (20) language barriers and use of interpreters;19        (21) victims' rights;20        (22) considerations for specific populations or 21    communities; and22        (23) special needs and tools for victims who are 23    foreign nationals.24    (c) In this Act, "human trafficking" means a violation or 25attempted violation of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 262012. "Human trafficking" includes trafficking of children and   SB2323 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1adults for both labor and sex services.  2    Section 65. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 3changing Sections 3-2-2 and 3-2.5-15 as follows: 4    (730 ILCS 5/3-2-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-2-2)5    Sec. 3-2-2. Powers and duties of the Department. 6    (1) In addition to the powers, duties, and 7responsibilities which are otherwise provided by law, the 8Department shall have the following powers:9        (a) To accept persons committed to it by the courts of 10    this State for care, custody, treatment, and 11    rehabilitation, and to accept federal prisoners and 12    noncitizens over whom the Office of the Federal Detention 13    Trustee is authorized to exercise the federal detention 14    function for limited purposes and periods of time.15        (b) To develop and maintain reception and evaluation 16    units for purposes of analyzing the custody and 17    rehabilitation needs of persons committed to it and to 18    assign such persons to institutions and programs under its 19    control or transfer them to other appropriate agencies. In 20    consultation with the Department of Alcoholism and 21    Substance Abuse (now the Department of Human Services), 22    the Department of Corrections shall develop a master plan 23    for the screening and evaluation of persons committed to 24    its custody who have alcohol or drug abuse problems, and   SB2323 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    for making appropriate treatment available to such 2    persons; the Department shall report to the General 3    Assembly on such plan not later than April 1, 1987. The 4    maintenance and implementation of such plan shall be 5    contingent upon the availability of funds.6        (b-1) To create and implement, on January 1, 2002, a 7    pilot program to establish the effectiveness of 8    pupillometer technology (the measurement of the pupil's 9    reaction to light) as an alternative to a urine test for 10    purposes of screening and evaluating persons committed to 11    its custody who have alcohol or drug problems. The pilot 12    program shall require the pupillometer technology to be 13    used in at least one Department of Corrections facility. 14    The Director may expand the pilot program to include an 15    additional facility or facilities as he or she deems 16    appropriate. A minimum of 4,000 tests shall be included in 17    the pilot program. The Department must report to the 18    General Assembly on the effectiveness of the program by 19    January 1, 2003.20        (b-5) To develop, in consultation with the Illinois 21    State Police, a program for tracking and evaluating each 22    inmate from commitment through release for recording his 23    or her gang affiliations, activities, or ranks.24        (c) To maintain and administer all State correctional 25    institutions and facilities under its control and to 26    establish new ones as needed. Pursuant to its power to   SB2323 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    establish new institutions and facilities, the Department 2    may, with the written approval of the Governor, authorize 3    the Department of Central Management Services to enter 4    into an agreement of the type described in subsection (d) 5    of Section 405-300 of the Department of Central Management 6    Services Law. The Department shall designate those 7    institutions which shall constitute the State Penitentiary 8    System. The Department of Juvenile Justice shall maintain 9    and administer all State youth centers pursuant to 10    subsection (d) of Section 3-2.5-20. 11        Pursuant to its power to establish new institutions 12    and facilities, the Department may authorize the 13    Department of Central Management Services to accept bids 14    from counties and municipalities for the construction, 15    remodeling, or conversion of a structure to be leased to 16    the Department of Corrections for the purposes of its 17    serving as a correctional institution or facility. Such 18    construction, remodeling, or conversion may be financed 19    with revenue bonds issued pursuant to the Industrial 20    Building Revenue Bond Act by the municipality or county. 21    The lease specified in a bid shall be for a term of not 22    less than the time needed to retire any revenue bonds used 23    to finance the project, but not to exceed 40 years. The 24    lease may grant to the State the option to purchase the 25    structure outright.26        Upon receipt of the bids, the Department may certify   SB2323 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    one or more of the bids and shall submit any such bids to 2    the General Assembly for approval. Upon approval of a bid 3    by a constitutional majority of both houses of the General 4    Assembly, pursuant to joint resolution, the Department of 5    Central Management Services may enter into an agreement 6    with the county or municipality pursuant to such bid.7        (c-5) To build and maintain regional juvenile 8    detention centers and to charge a per diem to the counties 9    as established by the Department to defray the costs of 10    housing each minor in a center. In this subsection (c-5), 11    "juvenile detention center" means a facility to house 12    minors during pendency of trial who have been transferred 13    from proceedings under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 to 14    prosecutions under the criminal laws of this State in 15    accordance with Section 5-805 of the Juvenile Court Act of 16    1987, whether the transfer was by operation of law or 17    permissive under that Section. The Department shall 18    designate the counties to be served by each regional 19    juvenile detention center.20        (d) To develop and maintain programs of control, 21    rehabilitation, and employment of committed persons within 22    its institutions.23        (d-5) To provide a pre-release job preparation program 24    for inmates at Illinois adult correctional centers. 25        (d-10) To provide educational and visitation 26    opportunities to committed persons within its institutions   SB2323 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    through temporary access to content-controlled tablets 2    that may be provided as a privilege to committed persons 3    to induce or reward compliance. 4        (e) To establish a system of supervision and guidance 5    of committed persons in the community.6        (f) To establish in cooperation with the Department of 7    Transportation to supply a sufficient number of prisoners 8    for use by the Department of Transportation to clean up 9    the trash and garbage along State, county, township, or 10    municipal highways as designated by the Department of 11    Transportation. The Department of Corrections, at the 12    request of the Department of Transportation, shall furnish 13    such prisoners at least annually for a period to be agreed 14    upon between the Director of Corrections and the Secretary 15    of Transportation. The prisoners used on this program 16    shall be selected by the Director of Corrections on 17    whatever basis he deems proper in consideration of their 18    term, behavior and earned eligibility to participate in 19    such program - where they will be outside of the prison 20    facility but still in the custody of the Department of 21    Corrections. Prisoners convicted of first degree murder, 22    or a Class X felony, or armed violence, or aggravated 23    kidnapping, or criminal sexual assault, aggravated 24    criminal sexual abuse or a subsequent conviction for 25    criminal sexual abuse, or forcible detention, or arson, or 26    a prisoner adjudged a Habitual Criminal shall not be   SB2323 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    eligible for selection to participate in such program. The 2    prisoners shall remain as prisoners in the custody of the 3    Department of Corrections and such Department shall 4    furnish whatever security is necessary. The Department of 5    Transportation shall furnish trucks and equipment for the 6    highway cleanup program and personnel to supervise and 7    direct the program. Neither the Department of Corrections 8    nor the Department of Transportation shall replace any 9    regular employee with a prisoner.10        (g) To maintain records of persons committed to it and 11    to establish programs of research, statistics, and 12    planning.13        (h) To investigate the grievances of any person 14    committed to the Department and to inquire into any 15    alleged misconduct by employees or committed persons; and 16    for these purposes it may issue subpoenas and compel the 17    attendance of witnesses and the production of writings and 18    papers, and may examine under oath any witnesses who may 19    appear before it; to also investigate alleged violations 20    of a parolee's or releasee's conditions of parole or 21    release; and for this purpose it may issue subpoenas and 22    compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of 23    documents only if there is reason to believe that such 24    procedures would provide evidence that such violations 25    have occurred.26        If any person fails to obey a subpoena issued under   SB2323 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    this subsection, the Director may apply to any circuit 2    court to secure compliance with the subpoena. The failure 3    to comply with the order of the court issued in response 4    thereto shall be punishable as contempt of court.5        (i) To appoint and remove the chief administrative 6    officers, and administer programs of training and 7    development of personnel of the Department. Personnel 8    assigned by the Department to be responsible for the 9    custody and control of committed persons or to investigate 10    the alleged misconduct of committed persons or employees 11    or alleged violations of a parolee's or releasee's 12    conditions of parole shall be conservators of the peace 13    for those purposes, and shall have the full power of peace 14    officers outside of the facilities of the Department in 15    the protection, arrest, retaking, and reconfining of 16    committed persons or where the exercise of such power is 17    necessary to the investigation of such misconduct or 18    violations. This subsection shall not apply to persons 19    committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice under the 20    Juvenile Court Act of 1987 on aftercare release.21        (j) To cooperate with other departments and agencies 22    and with local communities for the development of 23    standards and programs for better correctional services in 24    this State.25        (k) To administer all moneys and properties of the 26    Department.  SB2323 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1        (l) To report annually to the Governor on the 2    committed persons, institutions, and programs of the 3    Department.4        (l-5) (Blank).5        (m) To make all rules and regulations and exercise all 6    powers and duties vested by law in the Department.7        (n) To establish rules and regulations for 8    administering a system of sentence credits, established in 9    accordance with Section 3-6-3, subject to review by the 10    Prisoner Review Board.11        (o) To administer the distribution of funds from the 12    State Treasury to reimburse counties where State penal 13    institutions are located for the payment of assistant 14    state's attorneys' salaries under Section 4-2001 of the 15    Counties Code.16        (p) To exchange information with the Department of 17    Human Services and the Department of Healthcare and Family 18    Services for the purpose of verifying living arrangements 19    and for other purposes directly connected with the 20    administration of this Code and the Illinois Public Aid 21    Code.22        (q) To establish a diversion program.23        The program shall provide a structured environment for 24    selected technical parole or mandatory supervised release 25    violators and committed persons who have violated the 26    rules governing their conduct while in work release. This   SB2323 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    program shall not apply to those persons who have 2    committed a new offense while serving on parole or 3    mandatory supervised release or while committed to work 4    release.5        Elements of the program shall include, but shall not 6    be limited to, the following:7            (1) The staff of a diversion facility shall 8        provide supervision in accordance with required 9        objectives set by the facility.10            (2) Participants shall be required to maintain 11        employment.12            (3) Each participant shall pay for room and board 13        at the facility on a sliding-scale basis according to 14        the participant's income.15            (4) Each participant shall:16                (A) provide restitution to victims in 17            accordance with any court order;18                (B) provide financial support to his 19            dependents; and20                (C) make appropriate payments toward any other 21            court-ordered obligations.22            (5) Each participant shall complete community 23        service in addition to employment.24            (6) Participants shall take part in such 25        counseling, educational, and other programs as the 26        Department may deem appropriate.  SB2323 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1            (7) Participants shall submit to drug and alcohol 2        screening.3            (8) The Department shall promulgate rules 4        governing the administration of the program.5        (r) To enter into intergovernmental cooperation 6    agreements under which persons in the custody of the 7    Department may participate in a county impact 8    incarceration program established under Section 3-6038 or 9    3-15003.5 of the Counties Code.10        (r-5) (Blank).11        (r-10) To systematically and routinely identify with 12    respect to each streetgang active within the correctional 13    system: (1) each active gang; (2) every existing 14    inter-gang affiliation or alliance; and (3) the current 15    leaders in each gang. The Department shall promptly 16    segregate leaders from inmates who belong to their gangs 17    and allied gangs. "Segregate" means no physical contact 18    and, to the extent possible under the conditions and space 19    available at the correctional facility, prohibition of 20    visual and sound communication. For the purposes of this 21    paragraph (r-10), "leaders" means persons who:22            (i) are members of a criminal streetgang;23            (ii) with respect to other individuals within the 24        streetgang, occupy a position of organizer, 25        supervisor, or other position of management or 26        leadership; and  SB2323 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1            (iii) are actively and personally engaged in 2        directing, ordering, authorizing, or requesting 3        commission of criminal acts by others, which are 4        punishable as a felony, in furtherance of streetgang 5        related activity both within and outside of the 6        Department of Corrections.7    "Streetgang", "gang", and "streetgang related" have the 8    meanings ascribed to them in Section 10 of the Illinois 9    Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus Prevention Act.10        (s) To operate a super-maximum security institution, 11    in order to manage and supervise inmates who are 12    disruptive or dangerous and provide for the safety and 13    security of the staff and the other inmates.14        (t) To monitor any unprivileged conversation or any 15    unprivileged communication, whether in person or by mail, 16    telephone, or other means, between an inmate who, before 17    commitment to the Department, was a member of an organized 18    gang and any other person without the need to show cause or 19    satisfy any other requirement of law before beginning the 20    monitoring, except as constitutionally required. The 21    monitoring may be by video, voice, or other method of 22    recording or by any other means. As used in this 23    subdivision (1)(t), "organized gang" has the meaning 24    ascribed to it in Section 10 of the Illinois Streetgang 25    Terrorism Omnibus Prevention Act.26        As used in this subdivision (1)(t), "unprivileged   SB2323 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    conversation" or "unprivileged communication" means a 2    conversation or communication that is not protected by any 3    privilege recognized by law or by decision, rule, or order 4    of the Illinois Supreme Court.5        (u) To establish a Women's and Children's Pre-release 6    Community Supervision Program for the purpose of providing 7    housing and services to eligible female inmates, as 8    determined by the Department, and their newborn and young 9    children.10        (u-5) To issue an order, whenever a person committed 11    to the Department absconds or absents himself or herself, 12    without authority to do so, from any facility or program 13    to which he or she is assigned. The order shall be 14    certified by the Director, the Supervisor of the 15    Apprehension Unit, or any person duly designated by the 16    Director, with the seal of the Department affixed. The 17    order shall be directed to all sheriffs, coroners, and 18    police officers, or to any particular person named in the 19    order. Any order issued pursuant to this subdivision 20    (1)(u-5) shall be sufficient warrant for the officer or 21    person named in the order to arrest and deliver the 22    committed person to the proper correctional officials and 23    shall be executed the same as criminal process. 24        (u-6) To appoint a point of contact person who shall 25    receive suggestions, complaints, or other requests to the 26    Department from visitors to Department institutions or   SB2323 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    facilities and from other members of the public.2        (u-7) To collaborate with the Department of Human 3    Services and other State agencies to develop and implement 4    screening and follow-up protocols for intake and reentry 5    personnel and contractors on identification and response 6    to Department-involved individuals who demonstrate 7    indications of past labor or sex trafficking 8    victimization, criminal sexual exploitation or a history 9    of involvement in the sex trade that may put them at risk 10    of human trafficking. Protocols should include assessment 11    and provision of pre-release and post-release housing, 12    legal, medical, mental health and substance-use disorder 13    treatment services and recognize the specialized needs of 14    victims of human trafficking. 15        (u-8) To provide statewide training for Department of 16    Corrections intake and reentry personnel and contractors 17    on identification and response to Department-involved 18    individuals who demonstrate indications of past 19    trafficking victimization or child sexual exploitation 20    that put them at risk of human trafficking. 21        (u-9) To offer access to specialized services for 22    Department-involved individuals within the care that 23    demonstrate indications of past trafficking victimization 24    or child sexual exploitation that put them at risk of 25    trafficking. As used in this subsection, "specialized 26    services" means substance-use disorder, mental health,   SB2323 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    medical, case-management, housing, and other support 2    services by Department employees or contractors who have 3    completed victim-centered, trauma-informed training 4    specifically designed to address the complex psychological 5    and or physical needs of victims of human trafficking, 6    sexual exploitation, or a history of involvement with the 7    sex trade. 8        (v) To do all other acts necessary to carry out the 9    provisions of this Chapter.10    (2) The Department of Corrections shall by January 1, 111998, consider building and operating a correctional facility 12within 100 miles of a county of over 2,000,000 inhabitants, 13especially a facility designed to house juvenile participants 14in the impact incarceration program.15    (3) When the Department lets bids for contracts for 16medical services to be provided to persons committed to 17Department facilities by a health maintenance organization, 18medical service corporation, or other health care provider, 19the bid may only be let to a health care provider that has 20obtained an irrevocable letter of credit or performance bond 21issued by a company whose bonds have an investment grade or 22higher rating by a bond rating organization.23    (4) When the Department lets bids for contracts for food 24or commissary services to be provided to Department 25facilities, the bid may only be let to a food or commissary 26services provider that has obtained an irrevocable letter of   SB2323 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1credit or performance bond issued by a company whose bonds 2have an investment grade or higher rating by a bond rating 3organization.4    (5) On and after the date 6 months after August 16, 2013 5(the effective date of Public Act 98-488), as provided in the 6Executive Order 1 (2012) Implementation Act, all of the 7powers, duties, rights, and responsibilities related to State 8healthcare purchasing under this Code that were transferred 9from the Department of Corrections to the Department of 10Healthcare and Family Services by Executive Order 3 (2005) are 11transferred back to the Department of Corrections; however, 12powers, duties, rights, and responsibilities related to State 13healthcare purchasing under this Code that were exercised by 14the Department of Corrections before the effective date of 15Executive Order 3 (2005) but that pertain to individuals 16resident in facilities operated by the Department of Juvenile 17Justice are transferred to the Department of Juvenile Justice. 18    (6) The Department of Corrections shall provide lactation 19or nursing mothers rooms for personnel of the Department. The 20rooms shall be provided in each facility of the Department 21that employs nursing mothers. Each individual lactation room 22must: 23        (i) contain doors that lock; 24        (ii) have an "Occupied" sign for each door; 25        (iii) contain electrical outlets for plugging in 26    breast pumps;   SB2323 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1        (iv) have sufficient lighting and ventilation; 2        (v) contain comfortable chairs; 3        (vi) contain a countertop or table for all necessary 4    supplies for lactation; 5        (vii) contain a wastebasket and chemical cleaners to 6    wash one's hands and to clean the surfaces of the 7    countertop or table; 8        (viii) have a functional sink; 9        (ix) have a minimum of one refrigerator for storage of 10    the breast milk; and 11        (x) receive routine daily maintenance. 12(Source: P.A. 102-350, eff. 8-13-21; 102-535, eff. 1-1-22; 13102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1030, eff. 145-27-22; 103-834, eff. 1-1-25.) 15    (730 ILCS 5/3-2.5-15)16    Sec. 3-2.5-15. Department of Juvenile Justice; assumption 17of duties of the Juvenile Division.18    (a) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall assume the 19rights, powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Juvenile 20Division of the Department of Corrections. Personnel, books, 21records, property, and unencumbered appropriations pertaining 22to the Juvenile Division of the Department of Corrections 23shall be transferred to the Department of Juvenile Justice on 24the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 94th General 25Assembly. Any rights of employees or the State under the   SB2323 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1Personnel Code or any other contract or plan shall be 2unaffected by this transfer.3    (b) Department of Juvenile Justice personnel who are hired 4by the Department on or after the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of the 94th General Assembly and who 6participate or assist in the rehabilitative and vocational 7training of delinquent youths, supervise the daily activities 8involving direct and continuing responsibility for the youth's 9security, welfare and development, or participate in the 10personal rehabilitation of delinquent youth by training, 11supervising, and assisting lower level personnel who perform 12these duties must: (1) be over the age of 21 and (2) have a 13high school diploma or equivalent and either (A) a bachelor's 14or advanced degree from an accredited college or university or 15(B) 2 or more years of experience providing direct care to 16youth in the form of residential care, coaching, case 17management, or mentoring. This requirement shall not apply to 18security, clerical, food service, and maintenance staff that 19do not have direct and regular contact with youth. The degree 20requirements specified in this subsection (b) are not required 21of persons who provide vocational training and who have 22adequate knowledge in the skill for which they are providing 23the vocational training.24    (c) Subsection (b) of this Section does not apply to 25personnel transferred to the Department of Juvenile Justice on 26the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 94th General   SB2323 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1Assembly.2    (d) The Department shall be under the direction of the 3Director of Juvenile Justice as provided in this Code.4    (e) The Director shall organize divisions within the 5Department and shall assign functions, powers, duties, and 6personnel as required by law. The Director may create other 7divisions and may assign other functions, powers, duties, and 8personnel as may be necessary or desirable to carry out the 9functions and responsibilities vested by law in the 10Department. The Director may, with the approval of the Office 11of the Governor, assign to and share functions, powers, 12duties, and personnel with other State agencies such that 13administrative services and administrative facilities are 14provided by a shared administrative service center. Where 15possible, shared services which impact youth should be done 16with child-serving agencies. These administrative services may 17include, but are not limited to, all of the following 18functions: budgeting, accounting related functions, auditing, 19human resources, legal, procurement, training, data collection 20and analysis, information technology, internal investigations, 21intelligence, legislative services, emergency response 22capability, statewide transportation services, and general 23office support.24    (f) The Department of Juvenile Justice may enter into 25intergovernmental cooperation agreements under which minors 26adjudicated delinquent and committed to the Department of   SB2323 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1Juvenile Justice may participate in county juvenile impact 2incarceration programs established under Section 3-6039 of the 3Counties Code.4    (g) The Department of Juvenile Justice must comply with 5the ethnic and racial background data collection procedures 6provided in Section 4.5 of the Criminal Identification Act. 7    (h) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall implement a 8wellness program to support health and wellbeing among staff 9and service providers within the Department of Juvenile 10Justice environment. The Department of Juvenile Justice shall 11establish response teams to provide support to employees and 12staff affected by events that are both duty-related and not 13duty-related and provide training to response team members. 14The Department's wellness program shall be accessible to any 15Department employee or service provider, including contractual 16employees and approved volunteers. The wellness program may 17include information sharing, education and activities designed 18to support health and well-being within the Department's 19environment. Access to wellness response team support shall be 20voluntary and remain confidential.21    (i) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall collaborate 22with the Department of Human Services and other State agencies 23to develop and implement screening and follow-up protocols for 24intake and aftercare personnel on identification and response 25to children and adolescents who show indications of being 26victims of human trafficking or at risk of human trafficking.   SB2323 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1Protocols should include assessment and provision of 2pre-release and post-release housing, legal, medical, mental 3health, and substance use disorder treatment services and 4recognize the specialized needs of victims of human 5trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation.6    (j) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall require the 7juvenile justice system to provide access to specialized 8services for identified trafficked children and youth. In this 9subsection, "specialized services" means substance-use 10disorder, mental health, medical and other support services by 11Department employees and contractors who have completed 12victim-centered, trauma-informed training specifically 13designed to address the complex psychological and physical 14needs of victims of human trafficking, sexual exploitation, 15and involvement in the sex trade.16    (k) The Department of Juvenile Justice shall require 17statewide training for juvenile justice agencies and their 18direct service personnel on identification and response to 19child trafficking. 20(Source: P.A. 102-616, eff. 1-1-22; 103-290, eff. 7-28-23.) 21    Section 70. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 22changing Section 13-202.2 as follows: 23    (735 ILCS 5/13-202.2)  (from Ch. 110, par. 13-202.2)24    Sec. 13-202.2. Childhood sexual abuse.   SB2323 Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    (a) In this Section:2    "Childhood sexual abuse" means an act of sexual abuse that 3occurs when the person abused is under 18 years of age.4    "Sexual abuse" includes but is not limited to sexual 5conduct and sexual penetration as defined in Section 11-0.1 of 6the Criminal Code of 2012.7    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an action 8for damages for personal injury based on childhood sexual 9abuse or a violation of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 102012 in which the victim is a minor must be commenced within 20 11years of the date the limitation period begins to run under 12subsection (d) or within 20 years of the date the person abused 13discovers or through the use of reasonable diligence should 14discover both (i) that the act of childhood sexual abuse 15occurred and (ii) that the injury was caused by the childhood 16sexual abuse or a violation of Section 10-9 of the Criminal 17Code of 2012 in which the victim is a minor. The fact that the 18person abused discovers or through the use of reasonable 19diligence should discover that the act of childhood sexual 20abuse occurred is not, by itself, sufficient to start the 21discovery period under this subsection (b). Knowledge of the 22abuse does not constitute discovery of the injury or the 23causal relationship between any later-discovered injury and 24the abuse.25    (c) If the injury is caused by 2 or more acts of childhood 26sexual abuse or a violation of Section 10-9 of the Criminal   SB2323 Enrolled- 70 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1Code of 2012 in which the victim is a minor that are part of a 2continuing series of acts of childhood sexual abuse or a 3violation of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012 in which 4the victim is a minor by the same abuser, then the discovery 5period under subsection (b) shall be computed from the date 6the person abused discovers or through the use of reasonable 7diligence should discover both (i) that the last act of 8childhood sexual abuse or a violation of Section 10-9 of the 9Criminal Code of 2012 in which the victim is a minor in the 10continuing series occurred and (ii) that the injury was caused 11by any act of childhood sexual abuse or a violation of Section 1210-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012 in which the victim is a 13minor in the continuing series. The fact that the person 14abused discovers or through the use of reasonable diligence 15should discover that the last act of childhood sexual abuse in 16the continuing series occurred is not, by itself, sufficient 17to start the discovery period under subsection (b). Knowledge 18of the abuse does not constitute discovery of the injury or the 19causal relationship between any later-discovered injury and 20the abuse.21    (d) The limitation periods under subsection (b) do not 22begin to run before the person abused attains the age of 18 23years; and, if at the time the person abused attains the age of 2418 years he or she is under other legal disability, the 25limitation periods under subsection (b) do not begin to run 26until the removal of the disability.  SB2323 Enrolled- 71 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    (d-1) The limitation periods in subsection (b) do not run 2during a time period when the person abused is subject to 3threats, intimidation, manipulation, fraudulent concealment, 4or fraud perpetrated by the abuser or by any person acting in 5the interest of the abuser.6    (e) This Section applies to actions pending on the 7effective date of this amendatory Act of 1990 as well as to 8actions commenced on or after that date. The changes made by 9this amendatory Act of 1993 shall apply only to actions 10commenced on or after the effective date of this amendatory 11Act of 1993. The changes made by this amendatory Act of the 1293rd General Assembly apply to actions pending on the 13effective date of this amendatory Act of the 93rd General 14Assembly as well as actions commenced on or after that date. 15The changes made by this amendatory Act of the 96th General 16Assembly apply to actions commenced on or after the effective 17date of this amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly if the 18action would not have been time barred under any statute of 19limitations or statute of repose prior to the effective date 20of this amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly.21    (f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an action 22for damages based on childhood sexual abuse or a violation of 23Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 2012 in which the victim 24is a minor may be commenced at any time; provided, however, 25that the changes made by this amendatory Act of the 98th 26General Assembly apply to actions commenced on or after the   SB2323 Enrolled- 72 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1effective date of this amendatory Act of the 98th General 2Assembly if the action would not have been time barred under 3any statute of limitations or statute of repose prior to the 4effective date of this amendatory Act of the 98th General 5Assembly.6(Source: P.A. 101-435, eff. 8-20-19.) 7    Section 75. The Business Corporation Act of 1983 is 8amended by changing Section 12.35 as follows: 9    (805 ILCS 5/12.35)  (from Ch. 32, par. 12.35)10    Sec. 12.35. Grounds for administrative dissolution. The 11Secretary of State may dissolve any corporation 12administratively if:13    (a) It has failed to file its annual report or final 14transition annual report and pay its franchise tax as required 15by this Act before the first day of the anniversary month or, 16in the case of a corporation which has established an extended 17filing month, the extended filing month of the corporation of 18the year in which such annual report becomes due and such 19franchise tax becomes payable;20    (b) it has failed to file in the office of the Secretary of 21State any report after the expiration of the period prescribed 22in this Act for filing such report;23    (c) it has failed to pay any fees, franchise taxes, or 24charges prescribed by this Act;  SB2323 Enrolled- 73 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1    (d) it has misrepresented any material matter in any 2application, report, affidavit, or other document filed by the 3corporation pursuant to this Act;4    (e) it has failed to appoint and maintain a registered 5agent in this State;6    (f) it has tendered payment to the Secretary of State 7which is returned due to insufficient funds, a closed account, 8or for any other reason, and acceptable payment has not been 9subsequently tendered;10    (g) upon the failure of an officer or director to whom 11interrogatories have been propounded by the Secretary of State 12as provided in this Act, to answer the same fully and to file 13such answer in the office of the Secretary of State; or14    (h) if the answer to such interrogatories discloses, or if 15the fact is otherwise ascertained, that the proportion of the 16sum of the paid-in capital of such corporation represented in 17this State is greater than the amount on which such 18corporation has theretofore paid fees and franchise taxes, and 19the deficiency therein is not paid; or .20    (i) if the corporation or any of its incorporators or 21directors are convicted of any violation of Section 10-9 of 22the Criminal Code of 2012. 23(Source: P.A. 92-33, eff. 7-1-01; 93-59, eff. 7-1-03.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 251, 2026, except that this Section and paragraph (1) of 26subsection (b) of Sec. 1-90 of Section 10 take effect upon   SB2323 Enrolled- 74 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1becoming law.  SB2323 Enrolled- 75 -LRB104 02939 RLC 19420 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 505/45.1 new4    20 ILCS 1305/1-90 new5    20 ILCS 1505/1505-225 new6    20 ILCS 2605/2605-625 new7    50 ILCS 705/2from Ch. 85, par. 5028    50 ILCS 705/10.219    50 ILCS 705/10.2310    50 ILCS 705/10.27 new11    30 ILCS 500/25-210 new12    55 ILCS 80/4from Ch. 23, par. 180413    705 ILCS 405/5-175 new14    720 ILCS 5/10-915    725 ILCS 5/106B-516    725 ILCS 5/115-10from Ch. 38, par. 115-1017    725 ILCS 203/1018    725 ILCS 210/4.13 new19    730 ILCS 5/3-2-2from Ch. 38, par. 1003-2-220    730 ILCS 5/3-2.5-1521    735 ILCS 5/13-202.2from Ch. 110, par. 13-202.222    805 ILCS 5/12.35from Ch. 32, par. 12.35